New Mexico, session 2026, HB156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 24-5-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1959,
Chapter 329, Section 1, as amended) is amended to read:
"24-5-1. IMMUNIZATION REGULATIONS.--
A. The public health division of the department of
health shall, after consultation with the public education
department and the early childhood education and care
department, promulgate rules governing the immunization
against diseases deemed to be dangerous to the public health,
to be required of children attending licensed child care and
licensed early childhood care programs and public, private,
home or parochial schools in the state. Rules promulgated
pursuant to this subsection shall establish the immunizations
required and the manner and frequency of their administration
in accordance with recommendations from the department of
health. The public health division shall supervise and
secure the enforcement of the required immunization program.
B. The public health division of the department of HB 156/a
Page 1

health shall promulgate rules governing the immunization
against diseases deemed to be dangerous to the public health,
to be recommended for adults residing in the state. Rules
promulgated pursuant to this subsection shall establish the
immunizations recommended and the recommended manner and
frequency of their administration in accordance with guidance
from the department of health."
SECTION 2. REPEAL.--Laws 2025 (1st S.S.), Chapter 5,
Sections 8 through 13 are repealed. HB 156/a
Page 2